Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.115

Municipal court seal.

The municipal court shall have a seal which shall be the vignette of George Washington, with the words "Seal of The Municipal Court of . . . . . . (name of city), State of Washington," surrounding the vignette. All process from the court runs throughout the state. The supreme court may determine by rule what process must be issued under seal.

[ 1999 c 152 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 123.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.